test/src/morphology/noun-luojk_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked

# Even syllable new loanwords. Lexicon PREMIE, KULTUR, FAKTOR, INSPEKTØR, TELEFON, INSTITUTION, MISSION, PENSION, BENSIN,MASKIN, ADJEKTIV, ANTIKK, APOTEK, ADVOKAT, BUDSJETT, INTERNETT, INSTITUTT, PARTISIPP, ALLEGORI, PATENT, VARIANT, PARADIS, KOLLEKT, TEKSTIL, SYSTEM, AGRONOM, ADVERB, TABELL, AREAL, TELEGRAM, ORGAN, SEMINAR, SBSTANS, VALENS, TURIST, FANATISM, DERMAGOG, BOAKSA,

Tests:
  Noun - megabyte: # PREMIE # stum e
    megabyte+N+Sg+Nom: megabyte 
    megabyte+N+Sg+Gen: megabyta #byjdda, bájdda?
    megabyte+N+Sg+Acc: megabytav
    megabyte+N+Sg+Ine: megabytan
    megabyte+N+Sg+Ill: megabytaj
    megabyte+N+Pl+Ill: megabytajda
    megabyte+N+Ess: megabytan

  Noun - premie: # PREMIE
    premie+N+Sg+Nom: premie 
    premie+N+Sg+Gen: premia
    premie+N+Sg+Acc: premiav
    premie+N+Sg+Ine: premijin
    premie+N+Sg+Ill: premijij
    premie+N+Sg+Ela: premijis
    premie+N+Sg+Com: premijijn
    premie+N+Pl+Nom: premia 
    premie+N+Pl+Gen: premijij
    premie+N+Pl+Acc: premijijt
    premie+N+Pl+Ine: premijijn
    premie+N+Pl+Ill: premijijda
    premie+N+Pl+Ela: premijijs
    premie+N+Pl+Com: premijij
    premie+N+Ess: premijin
    premie+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: premiasj
    premie+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: premiatjasj
    premie+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    premie+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: premijahtes
    premie+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    premie+N+Abe: []

  Noun - muvrra: # KULTUR
    muvrra+N+Sg+Nom: muvrra
    muvrra+N+Sg+Acc: muvrav
    muvrra+N+Sg+Com: muvrajn
    muvrra+N+Ess: muvrran

  Noun - tastatuvrra: # KULTUR
    tastatuvrra+N+Sg+Nom: tastatuvrra
    tastatuvrra+N+Sg+Acc: tastatuvrav
    tastatuvrra+N+Sg+Com: tastatuvrajn
    tastatuvrra+N+Ess: tastatuvrran

  Noun - guovllokontåvrrå: # FAKTOR
    guovllokontåvrrå+N+Sg+Nom: guovllokontåvrrå
    guovllokontåvrrå+N+Sg+Acc: guovllokontåvråv
    guovllokontåvrrå+N+Pl+Com: guovllokontåvråj
    guovllokontåvrrå+N+Ess: guovllokontåvrrån

  Noun - generatåvrrå: # FAKTOR
    generatåvrrå+N+Sg+Nom: generatåvrrå
    generatåvrrå+N+Sg+Acc: generatåvråv
    generatåvrrå+N+Pl+Com: generatåvråj
    generatåvrrå+N+Ess: generatåvrrån

  Noun - kommandørra: # INSPETØR
    kommandørra+N+Sg+Nom: kommandørra 
    kommandørra+N+Sg+Acc: kommandørav
    kommandørra+N+Sg+Ill: kommandørraj 

  Noun - kanåvnnå: # TELEFON
    kanåvnnå+N+Sg+Nom: kanåvnnå 
    kanåvnnå+N+Sg+Ine: kanåvnån
    kanåvnnå+N+Sg+Ill: kanåvnnåj

  Noun - kvalifikasjåvnnå: # INSTITUTION
    kvalifikasjåvnnå+N+Sg+Nom: kvalifikasjåvnnå 
    kvalifikasjåvnnå+N+Sg+Gen: kvalifikasjåvnå 
    kvalifikasjåvnnå+N+Sg+Ill: kvalifikasjåvnnåj

  Noun - miehttsekommisjåvnnå: # MISSION
    miehttsekommisjåvnnå+N+Sg+Nom: miehttsekommisjåvnnå 
    miehttsekommisjåvnnå+N+Sg+Ine: miehttsekommisjåvnån 
    miehttsekommisjåvnnå+N+Sg+Ill: miehttsekommisjåvnnåj

  Noun - provisjåvnnå: # PENSION
    provisjåvnnå+N+Sg+Nom: provisjåvnnå 
    provisjåvnnå+N+Sg+Ine: provisjåvnån 
    provisjåvnnå+N+Sg+Ill: provisjåvnnåj

  Noun - rosijnna: # BENSIN
    rosijnna+N+Sg+Nom: rosijnna
    rosijnna+N+Sg+Ine: rosijnan
    rosijnna+N+Sg+Ill: rosijnnaj

  Noun - goarrommasjijnna: # MASKIN
    goarrommasjijnna+N+Sg+Nom: goarrommasjijnna 
    goarrommasjijnna+N+Sg+Ine: goarrommasjijnan 
    goarrommasjijnna+N+Sg+Ill: goarrommasjijnnaj

  Noun - habitijvva: # ADJEKTIV
    habitijvva+N+Sg+Nom: habitijvva
    habitijvva+N+Sg+Ine: habitijvan 
    habitijvva+N+Sg+Ill: habitijvvaj

  Noun - heraldihkka: # ANTIKK
    heraldihkka+N+Sg+Nom: heraldihkka 
    heraldihkka+N+Sg+Ine: heraldihkan 
    heraldihkka+N+Sg+Ill: heraldihkkaj

  Noun - diskotehkka: # APOTEK
    diskotehkka+N+Sg+Nom: diskotehkka 
    diskotehkka+N+Sg+Ine: diskotehkan
    diskotehkka+N+Sg+Ill: diskotehkkaj

  Noun - álggomandáhtta: # ADVOKAT
    álggomandáhtta+N+Sg+Nom: álggomandáhtta 
    álggomandáhtta+N+Sg+Ine: álggomandáhtan 
    álggomandáhtta+N+Sg+Ill: álggomandáhttaj

  Noun - åhpadusnæhtta: # BUDSJETT
    åhpadusnæhtta+N+Sg+Nom: åhpadusnæhtta 
    åhpadusnæhtta+N+Sg+Ine: åhpadusnehtan 
    åhpadusnæhtta+N+Sg+Ill: åhpadusnæhttaj

  Noun - internæhtta: # INTERNET
    internæhtta+N+Sg+Nom: internæhtta 
    internæhtta+N+Sg+Ine: internehtan
    internæhtta+N+Sg+Ill: internæhttaj

  Noun - kvartsihtta: # INSTITUTT
    kvartsihtta+N+Sg+Nom: kvartsihtta 
    kvartsihtta+N+Sg+Ine: kvartsihtan
    kvartsihtta+N+Sg+Ill: kvartsihttaj

  Noun - minuhtta: # INSTITUTT
    minuhtta+N+Sg+Nom: minuhtta 
    minuhtta+N+Sg+Ine: minuhtan
    minuhtta+N+Sg+Ill: minuhttaj

  Noun - prinsihppa: # PARTISIPP
    prinsihppa+N+Sg+Nom: prinsihppa 
    prinsihppa+N+Sg+Ine: prinsihpan 
    prinsihppa+N+Sg+Ill: prinsihppaj

  Noun - prosodija: # ALLEGORI
    prosodija+N+Sg+Nom: prosodija 
    prosodija+N+Sg+Ine: prosodijan 
    prosodija+N+Sg+Ill: prosodijaj

  Noun - sakramænnta: # PATENT
    sakramænnta+N+Sg+Nom: sakramænnta 
    sakramænnta+N+Sg+Ine: sakramentan
    sakramænnta+N+Sg+Ill: sakramænntaj

  Noun - sergeánnta: # VARIANT
    sergeánnta+N+Sg+Nom: sergeánnta 
    sergeánnta+N+Sg+Ine: sergeántan
    sergeánnta+N+Sg+Ill: sergeánntaj

  Noun - avijssa: # PARADIS
    avijssa+N+Sg+Nom: avijssa 
    avijssa+N+Sg+Ine: avijsan 
    avijssa+N+Sg+Ill: avijssaj

  Noun - effækta: # KOLLEKT
    effækta+N+Sg+Nom: effækta 
    effækta+N+Sg+Ine: effevtan 
    effækta+N+Sg+Ill: effæktaj

  Noun - klusijlla: # TEKSTIL
    klusijlla+N+Sg+Nom: klusijlla 
    klusijlla+N+Sg+Ine: klusijlan 
    klusijlla+N+Sg+Ill: klusijllaj

  Noun - metersystebma: # SYSTEM
    metersystebma+N+Sg+Nom: metersystebma 
    metersystebma+N+Sg+Ine: metersysteman
    metersystebma+N+Sg+Ill: metersystebmaj

  Noun - symptåvmmå: # AGRONOM
    symptåvmmå+N+Sg+Nom: symptåvmmå 
    symptåvmmå+N+Sg+Ine: symptåvmån 
    symptåvmmå+N+Sg+Ill: symptåvmmåj

  Noun - viehkkeværbba: # ADVERB
    viehkkeværbba+N+Sg+Nom: viehkkeværbba 
    viehkkeværbba+N+Sg+Ine: viehkkeverban 
    viehkkeværbba+N+Sg+Ill: viehkkeværbbaj

  Noun - hotælla: # TABELL
    hotælla+N+Sg+Nom: hotælla 
    hotælla+N+Sg+Ine: hotellan 
    hotælla+N+Sg+Ill: hotællaj

  Noun - ideálla: # AREAL
    ideálla+N+Sg+Nom: ideálla 
    ideálla+N+Sg+Ine: ideálan
    ideálla+N+Sg+Ill: ideállaj

  Noun - kardiográmma: # TELEGRAM
    kardiográmma+N+Sg+Nom: kardiográmma 
    kardiográmma+N+Sg+Ine: kardiográmman 
    kardiográmma+N+Sg+Ill: kardiográmmaj

  Noun - kontopládna: # ORGAN
    kontopládna+N+Sg+Nom: kontopládna 
    kontopládna+N+Sg+Ine: kontoplánan 
    kontopládna+N+Sg+Ill: kontopládnaj

  Noun - lineárra: # SEMINAR
    lineárra+N+Sg+Nom: lineárra 
    lineárra+N+Sg+Ine: lineáran 
    lineárra+N+Sg+Ill: lineárraj

  Noun - relevánssa: # SBSTANS
    relevánssa+N+Sg+Nom: relevánssa 
    relevánssa+N+Sg+Ine: relevánsan
    relevánssa+N+Sg+Ill: relevánssaj

  Noun - sekvænssa: # VALENS
    sekvænssa+N+Sg+Nom: sekvænssa 
    sekvænssa+N+Sg+Ine: sekvensan 
    sekvænssa+N+Sg+Ill: sekvænssaj

  Noun - seminarissta: # TURIST
    seminarissta+N+Sg+Nom: seminarissta 
    seminarissta+N+Sg+Ine: seminaristan 
    seminarissta+N+Sg+Ill: seminarisstaj

  Noun - singularissma: # FANATISM
    singularissma+N+Sg+Nom: singularissma 
    singularissma+N+Sg+Ine: singularisman 
    singularissma+N+Sg+Ill: singularissmaj

  Noun - etnologa: # DEMAGOG
    etnologa+N+Sg+Nom: etnologa 
    etnologa+N+Sg+Ine: etnologan
    etnologa+N+Sg+Ill: etnologaj

  Noun - poasstaboaksa: # BOAKSA
    poasstaboaksa+N+Sg+Nom: poasstaboaksa
    poasstaboaksa+N+Sg+Acc: poasstabåksav
    poasstaboaksa+N+Sg+Com: poasstabåksajn
    poasstaboaksa+N+Ess: poasstaboaksan

  Noun - rádio: # KINO
    rádio+N+Sg+Nom: rádio
    rádio+N+Sg+Acc: rádiov
    rádio+N+Sg+Com: rádiojn
    rádio+N+Ess: rádion

  Noun - serie: # KINO
    serie+N+Sg+Nom: serie 
    serie+N+Sg+Gen: seria 
    serie+N+Sg+Acc: seriav #serijav?
    serie+N+Sg+Ine: serijin
    serie+N+Sg+Ill: serijij
    serie+N+Sg+Ela: serijis
    serie+N+Sg+Com: serijijn
    serie+N+Ess: serijin
